Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.080

Civil penalties. (Effective until April 1, 2025.)

(1) Each violation of the requirements of this chapter that are not subject to the criminal penalties under *RCW 19.290.070 shall be punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars.

(2) Within two years of being convicted of a violation of any of the requirements of this chapter that are not subject to the criminal penalties under *RCW 19.290.070, each subsequent violation shall be punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars.

[ 2007 c 377 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.290.070 was recodified as RCW 9A.56.410 pursuant to 2022 c 221 s 10.

PDFRCW 19.290.080

Civil penalties. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) Each violation of the requirements of this chapter that are not subject to criminal penalties shall be a civil penalty punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

(2) Within two years of a violation of any of the requirements of this chapter that results in a civil penalty under this section, each subsequent violation shall be punishable by a fine of not more than $2,000.

[ 2024 c 301 s 9; 2007 c 377 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.